Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-560
Violations; penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provision of sections 60-501 to 60-569 for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 60, p. 503;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 87.